Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 2 Department of Transportation

Cross references.

Georgia Regional Transportation Authority, T. 50, C. 32.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 898, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The department will form a pilot program that will provide a state level flow through point for any available federal funding or other forms of financial and development sources and assistance for local, regional, and public-private streetcar projects. Any funding through bonds for such pilot and grant program shall be administered by the State Road and Tollway Authority.”
This provision for a pilot program was repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 498, § 5/SB 150.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of general applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-1.